Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.022

"Nonresident tuition fees differential" defined.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter "nonresident tuition fees differential" means the difference between resident tuition fees and nonresident tuition fees.

[ 1992 c 231 s 32.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.